Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.030

Licenses—Renewal.

The secretary shall determine administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for licenses and renewals as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 31; 1991 c 3 s 143; 1980 c 101 s 3.]